test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-eekva_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# Author: Csilla HORVATH (Szeged Team)

# todo:
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - э̄ква: # "(eng) old woman, wife/(hun) öregasszony, feleség/(rus) старуха, жена" - full paradigm

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom: э̄ква
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc: э̄кват
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl: э̄кваныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Instr: э̄квал
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Trans: э̄кваг

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom: э̄кваг
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc: э̄квагт
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat: э̄квагн
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl: э̄квагныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Instr: э̄квагтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom: э̄кват
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc: э̄кватт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat: э̄кватн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl: э̄кватныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Instr: э̄кватыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: э̄квам
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: э̄квамт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: э̄квамн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: э̄квамныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr: э̄квамтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: э̄квагум
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc: э̄квагумт
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat: э̄квагумн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl: э̄квагумныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr: э̄квагумтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: э̄кванум
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc: э̄кванумт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: э̄кванумн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: э̄кванумныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr: э̄кванумтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: э̄квант
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: э̄кванн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: э̄кванныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr: э̄квантыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: э̄квагын
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc: э̄квагынт
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat: э̄квагынн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl: э̄квагынныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr: э̄квагынтыл

#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: э̄кван(ын)
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: э̄кван(ын)т
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: э̄кван(ын)н
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: э̄кван(ын)ныл
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr: э̄кван(ын)тыл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: э̄квант
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: э̄кванн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: э̄кванныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr: э̄квантыл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: э̄кванын
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: э̄кванынт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: э̄кванынн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: э̄кванынныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr: э̄кванынтыл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: э̄кватэ
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: э̄кватэт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: э̄кватэн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: э̄кватэныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr: э̄кватэтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: э̄кваге
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc: э̄квагет
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat: э̄кваген
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl: э̄квагеныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr: э̄квагетыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: э̄кванэ
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc: э̄кванэт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: э̄кванэн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: э̄кванэныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr: э̄кванэтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: э̄квамен
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: э̄квамент
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat: э̄кваменн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl: э̄кваменныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr: э̄кваментыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: э̄квагамен
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc: э̄квагамент
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat: э̄квагаменн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl: э̄квагаменныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr: э̄квагаментыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: э̄кванамен
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc: э̄кванамент
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat: э̄кванаменн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl: э̄кванаменныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr: э̄кванаментыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: э̄квант
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat: э̄кванн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl: э̄кванныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr: э̄квантыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: э̄кваген
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc: э̄квагент
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat: э̄квагенн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl: э̄квагенныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr: э̄квагентыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: э̄кванэн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc: э̄кванэнт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat: э̄кванэнн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl: э̄кванэнныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr: э̄кванэнтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: э̄кватэн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: э̄кватэнт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat: э̄кватэнн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl: э̄кватэнныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr: э̄кватэнтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: э̄кваген
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc: э̄квагент
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat: э̄квагенн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl: э̄квагенныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr: э̄квагентыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: э̄кванэн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc: э̄кванэнт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat: э̄кванэнн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl: э̄кванэнныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr: э̄кванэнтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: э̄квав
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: э̄квавт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: э̄квавн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: э̄квавныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr: э̄квавтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: э̄квагув
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc: э̄квагувт
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat: э̄квагувн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl: э̄квагувныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr: э̄квагувтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: э̄кванув
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc: э̄кванувт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: э̄кванувн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: э̄кванувныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr: э̄кванувтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: э̄квант
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: э̄кванн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: э̄кванныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr: э̄квантыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: э̄кваген
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc: э̄квагент
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat: э̄квагенн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl: э̄квагенныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr: э̄квагентыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: э̄кванэн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc: э̄кванэнт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: э̄кванэнн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: э̄кванэнныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr: э̄кванэнтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: э̄кваныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: э̄кванылт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: э̄кванылн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: э̄кванылныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr: э̄кванылтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: э̄кваганыл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc: э̄кваганылт
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat: э̄кваганылн
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl: э̄кваганылныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr: э̄кваганылтыл

#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: э̄кван(ан)ыл
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: э̄кван(ан)ылт
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: э̄кван(ан)ылн
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: э̄кван(ан)ылныл
#     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr: э̄кван(ан)ылтыл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: э̄кваныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: э̄кванылт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: э̄кванылн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: э̄кванылныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr: э̄кванылтыл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: э̄квананыл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: э̄квананылт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: э̄квананылн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: э̄квананылныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr: э̄квананылтыл
